test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-masinahikanahtik_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - masinahikanâhtik - ok : # -m animate noun, pencil, Wolvengrey
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg: masinahikanâhtik
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimasinahikanâhtik
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimasinahikanâhtik
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: omasinahikanâhtika
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: omasinahikanâhtikoyiwa
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimasinahikanâhtikonân
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimasinahikanâhtikonaw
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimasinahikanâhtikowâw
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: omasinahikanâhtikowâwa
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: omasinahikanâhtikoyiwa
     
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl: masinahikanâhtikwak
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimasinahikanâhtikak
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimasinahikanâhtikak
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: omasinahikanâhtika
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: omasinahikanâhtikoyiwa
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimasinahikanâhtikonânak
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimasinahikanâhtikonawak
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimasinahikanâhtikowâwak
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: omasinahikanâhtikowâwa
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: omasinahikanâhtikoyiwa
     
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Obv: masinahikanâhtikwa
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Loc: [masinahikanâhtikohk, masinahikanâhtikinâhk]
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimasinahikanâhtikohk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimasinahikanâhtikohk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: omasinahikanâhtikohk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: omasinahikanâhtikoyihk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimasinahikanâhtikonâhk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimasinahikanâhtikonâhk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimasinahikanâhtikowâhk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: omasinahikanâhtikowâhk
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: omasinahikanâhtikoyihk
     
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [masinahikanâhcikos, masinahikanâhcikosis]
     masinahikanâhtik+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [masinahikanâhcikosak, masinahikanâhcikosisak]
